Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.356

Natural person.

"Natural person" means a human being.

[ 2010 c 161 s 125.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.